California statutes. Corporations Code
(g) The removal of any director if it appears that the director has been guilty of dishonesty, misconduct, neglect or abuse of trust in conducting the winding up or if the director is unable to act. The court may order an election to fill the vacancy so caused, and may enjoin, for such time as it considers proper, the reelection of the director so removed; or the court, in lieu of ordering an election, may appoint a director to fill the vacancy caused by such removal. Any director so appointed by the court shall serve until the next annual meeting of shareholders or until a successor is elected or appointed.

(h) Staying the prosecution of any suit, proceeding or action against the corporation and requiring the parties to present and prove their claims in the manner required of other creditors.

(i) The determination of
 whether adequate provision has been made for payment or satisfaction of all debts and liabilities not actually paid.

(j) The making of orders for the withdrawal or termination of proceedings to wind up and dissolve, subject to conditions for the protection of shareholders and creditors.

(k) The making of an order, upon the allowance or settlement of the final accounts of the directors or such other persons, that the corporation has been duly wound up and is dissolved. Upon the making of such order, the corporate existence shall cease except for purposes of further winding up if needed.

(l) The making of orders for the bringing in of new parties as the court deems proper for the determination of all questions and matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.

(a) All creditors and claimants may be barred from participation in any distribution of the general assets if they fail to make and present claims and proofs within such time as the court may direct, which shall not be less than four nor more than six months after the first publication of notice to creditors unless it appears by affidavit that there are no claims, in which case the time limit may be three months. If it is shown that a claimant did not receive notice because of absence from the state or other cause, the court may allow a claim to be filed or presented at any time before distribution is completed.

(b) Such notice to creditors shall be published not less than once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the proceeding is pending or, if there is no such newspaper published in that county, in such newspaper as may be designated by the court, directing creditors and claimants to make and present claims and proofs to the person, at the place and within the time specified in the notice. A copy of the notice shall be mailed to each person shown as a creditor or claimant on the books of the corporation, at such person’s last known address.

(c) Holders of secured claims may prove for the whole debt in order to realize any deficiency. If such creditors fail to present their claims they shall be barred only as to any right to claim against the general assets for any deficiency in the amount realized on their security.

(d) Before any distribution is made the amount of any unmatured, contingent or disputed claim against the corporation which has been presented and has not been disallowed, or such part of any such claim as the holder would be entitled to if the claim were due, established or absolute, shall be paid into court and there remain to be paid over to the party when the party becomes entitled thereto or, if the party fails to establish a claim, to be paid over or distributed with the other assets of the corporation to those entitled thereto; or such other provision for the full payment of such claim, if and when established, shall be made as the court may deem adequate. A creditor whose claim has been allowed but is not yet due shall be entitled to its present value upon distribution.

(e) Suits against the corporation on claims which have been rejected shall be commenced within 30 days
 after written notice of rejection thereof is given to the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.

(a) Upon the final settlement of the accounts of the directors or other persons appointed pursuant to Section 1805 and the determination that the corporation’s affairs are in condition for it to be dissolved, the court may make an order declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved. The order shall declare:

(1) That the corporation has been duly wound up, that a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been filed
 with the Franchise Tax Board as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and that its known debts and liabilities have been paid or adequately provided for, or that those debts and liabilities have been paid as far as its assets permitted, as the case may be. If there are known debts or liabilities for payment of which adequate provision has been made, the order shall state what provision has been made, setting forth the name and address of the corporation, person or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed the payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made or such other information as may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability.

(2) That its known assets have been distributed to the persons entitled thereto or that it acquired no known
 assets, as the case may be.

(3) That the accounts of directors or such other persons have been settled and that they are discharged from their duties and liabilities to creditors and shareholders.

(4) That the corporation is dissolved.

The court may make such additional orders and grant such further relief as it deems proper upon the evidence submitted.

(b) Upon the making of the order declaring the corporation dissolved, corporate existence shall cease except for the purposes of further winding up if needed; and the directors or such other persons shall be discharged from their duties and liabilities, except in respect to completion of the winding up.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 7.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1809.

Whenever a corporation is dissolved or its existence forfeited by order, decree or judgment of a court, a copy of the order, decree or judgment, certified by the clerk of court, shall forthwith be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Voluntary Dissolution [1900. - 1907.]

1900.

(a) Any corporation may elect voluntarily to wind up and dissolve by the vote of shareholders holding shares representing 50 percent or more of the voting power.

(b) Any corporation which comes within one of the following descriptions may elect by approval by the board to wind up and dissolve:

(1) A corporation as to which an order for relief has been entered under Chapter 7 of the federal bankruptcy law.

(2) A corporation which has disposed of all of its assets
 and has not conducted any business for a period of five years immediately preceding the adoption of the resolution electing to dissolve the corporation.

(3) A corporation which has issued no shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

1900.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, when a corporation has not issued shares, a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators may sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating the following:

(1) That the certificate of dissolution is being filed within 12 months from the date the articles of incorporation were filed.

(2) That the corporation does not have any debts or other liabilities, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(3) That the tax liability will be satisfied on a taxes paid basis or that a person or corporation or other business entity assumes the tax liability, if any, of the dissolving corporation and is responsible for additional corporate taxes, if any, that are assessed and that become due after the date of the assumption of the tax liability.

(4) That a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(5) That the corporation has not conducted any
 business from the time of the filing of the articles of incorporation.

(6) That the known assets of the corporation remaining after payment of, or adequately providing for, known debts and liabilities have been distributed to the persons entitled thereto or that the corporation acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(7) That a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators authorized the dissolution and elected to dissolve the corporation.

(8) That the corporation has not issued any shares, and if the corporation has received payments for shares from investors, those payments have been returned to those investors.

(9) That the corporation is
 dissolved.

(b) A certificate of dissolution signed and verified pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(c) Upon filing a certificate of dissolution pursuant to subdivision (b), a corporation shall be dissolved and its powers, rights, and privileges shall cease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

(a) Whenever a corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve a certificate evidencing such election shall forthwith be filed. 

(b) The certificate shall be an officers’ certificate or shall be signed and verified by at least a majority of the directors then in office or by one or more shareholders authorized to do so by shareholders holding shares representing 50 percent or more of the voting power and shall set forth: 

(1) That the corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve. 

(2) If the election was made by the vote of shareholders, the number of shares voting for the election and that the election was made by shareholders representing at least 50 percent of the voting power. 

(3) If the certificate is executed by a shareholder or shareholders, that the subscribing shareholder or shareholders were authorized to execute the certificate by shareholders holding shares representing at least 50 percent of the voting power. 

(4) If the election was made by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1900, the certificate shall also set forth the circumstances showing the corporation to be within one of the categories described in said subdivision. 

(c) If an election to dissolve made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1900
 is made by the vote of all the outstanding shares and a statement to that effect is added to the certificate of dissolution pursuant to Section 1905, the separate filing of the certificate of election pursuant to this section is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

(a) A voluntary election to wind up and dissolve may be revoked prior to distribution of any assets by the vote of shareholders holding shares representing a majority of the voting power, or by approval by the board if the election was by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1900. Thereupon a certificate evidencing the revocation shall be signed, verified and filed in the manner prescribed by Section 1901.

(b) The certificate shall set forth:

(1) That the corporation has revoked its election to wind up and
 dissolve.

(2) That no assets have been distributed pursuant to the election.

(3) If the revocation was made by the vote of shareholders, the number of shares voting for the revocation and the total number of outstanding shares the holders of which were entitled to vote on the revocation.

(4) If the election and revocation was by the board, that shall be stated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

(a) Voluntary proceedings for winding up the corporation commence upon the adoption of the resolution of shareholders or directors of the corporation electing to wind up and dissolve, or upon the filing with the corporation of a written consent of shareholders thereto.

(b) When a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall continue to act as a board and shall have full powers to wind up and settle its affairs, both before and after the filing of the certificate of dissolution.

(c) When a voluntary
 proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to carry on business except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up thereof and except during such period as the board may deem necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value pending a sale of its business or assets, or both, in whole or in part. The board shall cause written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for voluntary winding up to be given by mail to all shareholders (except no notice need be given to the shareholders who voted in favor of winding up and dissolving the corporation) and to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

If a corporation is in the process of voluntary winding up, the superior court of the proper county, upon the petition of (a) the corporation, or (b) a shareholder or shareholders who hold shares representing 5 percent or more of the total number of any class of outstanding shares, or (c) any shareholder or shareholders of a close corporation, or (d) three or more creditors, and upon such notice to the corporation and to other persons interested in the corporation as shareholders and creditors as the court may order, may take jurisdiction over such voluntary winding up proceeding if that appears necessary for the protection of any parties in interest. The court, if it
 assumes jurisdiction, may make such orders as to any and all matters concerning the winding up of the affairs of the corporation and for the protection of its shareholders and creditors as justice and equity may require. The provisions of Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 1800) (except Sections 1800 and 1801) shall apply to such court proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

(a) When a corporation has been completely wound up without court proceedings therefor, a majority of the directors then in office shall sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating:

(1) That the corporation has been completely wound up.

(2) That its known debts and liabilities have been actually paid, or adequately provided for, or paid or adequately provided for as far as its assets permitted, or that it
 has incurred no known debts or liabilities, as the case may be. If there are known debts or liabilities for payment of which adequate provision has been made, the certificate shall state what provision has been made, setting forth the name and address of the corporation, person or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed the payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made or any other information that may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability.

(3) That its known assets have been distributed to the persons entitled thereto or that it acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(4) That the corporation is dissolved.

(5) If no certificate of election is to be filed pursuant to
 subdivision (c) of Section 1901, that the election to dissolve was made by the vote of all the outstanding shares.

(6) That a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board, as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The certificate of dissolution shall be filed with the Secretary of State and thereupon the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of the corporation shall cease. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 10.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.1.

If a corporation has filed a certificate of dissolution with the Secretary of State on or after January 1, 1992, and before the effective date of the act adding this section, pursuant to Section 1905, prior to its amendment by the act adding this section, and the Franchise Tax Board has not, as of that effective date, made the determination required by subdivision (c) of Section 1905, prior to its amendment by the act adding this section, then the corporation shall be dissolved as of the date of filing the certificate of dissolution and thereupon its corporate
 existence shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 11.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1906.

Except as otherwise provided by law, if the term of existence for which any corporation was organized expires without renewal or extension thereof, the board shall terminate its business and wind up its affairs; and when the business and affairs of the corporation have been wound up a majority of the directors shall execute and file a certificate conforming to the requirements of Section 1905.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1907.

(a) The board, in lieu of filing the certificate of dissolution, may petition the superior court of the proper county for an order declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved. Such petition shall be filed in the name of the corporation.

(b) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall make an order requiring all persons interested to show cause why an order should not be made declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved and shall direct that the order be served by notice to all creditors, claimants and shareholders in the same manner as the notice given under
 subdivision (b) of Section 1807.

(c) Any person claiming to be interested as shareholder, creditor or otherwise may appear in the proceeding at any time before the expiration of 30 days from the completion of publication of the order to show cause and contest the petition, and upon failure to appear such person’s claim shall be barred.

(d) Thereafter an order shall be entered and filed and have the effect as prescribed in Sections 1808 and 1809.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. General Provisions Relating to Dissolution [2000. - 2011.]

2000.

(a) Subject to any contrary provision in the articles, which may include a reference to a separate written agreement between two or more shareholders pertaining to the purchase of shares:

In any suit for involuntary dissolution, or in any proceeding for voluntary dissolution initiated by the vote of shareholders representing only 50 percent of the voting power, the corporation or, if it does not elect to purchase, the holders of 50 percent or more of the voting power of the corporation (the “purchasing parties”) may avoid the dissolution of the corporation and the appointment
 of any receiver by purchasing for cash the shares owned by the plaintiffs or by the shareholders so initiating the proceeding (the “moving parties”) at their fair value.

The fair value shall be determined on the basis of the liquidation value as of the valuation date but taking into account the possibility, if any, of sale of the entire business as a going concern in a liquidation. In fixing the value, the amount of any damages resulting if the initiation of the dissolution is a breach by any moving party or parties of an agreement with the purchasing party or parties may be deducted from the amount payable to the moving party or parties, unless the ground for dissolution is that specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1800. The election of the corporation to purchase may be made by the approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) excluding
 shares held by the moving parties.

(b) If the purchasing parties (1) elect to purchase the shares owned by the moving parties, and (2) are unable to agree with the moving parties upon the fair value of those shares, and (3) give bond with sufficient security to pay the estimated reasonable expenses (including attorneys’ fees) of the moving parties if
 those expenses are recoverable under subdivision (c), the court upon application of the purchasing parties, either in the pending action or in a proceeding initiated in the superior court of the proper county by the purchasing parties in the case of a voluntary election to wind up and dissolve, shall stay the winding up and dissolution proceeding and shall proceed to ascertain and fix the fair value of the shares owned by the moving parties.

(c) The court shall appoint three disinterested appraisers to appraise the fair value of the shares owned by the moving parties, and shall make an order referring the matter to the appraisers so appointed for the purpose of ascertaining the value. The order shall prescribe the time and manner of producing evidence, if evidence is required. The award of the appraisers or of a majority of
 them, when confirmed by the court, shall be final and conclusive upon all parties. The court shall enter a decree, which shall provide in the alternative for winding up and dissolution of the corporation unless payment is made for the shares within the time specified by the decree. If the purchasing parties do not make payment for the shares within the time specified, judgment shall be entered against them and the surety or sureties on the bond for the amount of the expenses (including attorneys’ fees) of the moving parties. Any shareholder aggrieved by the action of the court may appeal the court’s decision.

(d) If the purchasing parties desire to prevent the winding up and dissolution, they shall pay to the moving parties the value of their shares ascertained and decreed within the time specified pursuant to this section, or, in case of an
 appeal, as fixed on appeal. On receiving payment or the tender thereof, the moving parties shall transfer their shares to the purchasing parties.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner of shares who has entered into an agreement under Section 300 or 706.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the valuation date shall be (1) in the case of a suit for involuntary dissolution under Section 1800, the date upon which that action was commenced, or (2) in the case of a proceeding for voluntary dissolution initiated by the vote of shareholders representing only 50 percent of the voting power, the date upon which that proceeding was initiated. However, in either case the court may, upon the hearing of a motion by any party, and for good cause
 shown, designate some other date as the valuation date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.

The powers and duties of the directors (or other persons appointed by the court pursuant to Section 1805) and officers after commencement of a dissolution proceeding include, but are not limited to, the following acts in the name and on behalf of the corporation:

(a) To elect officers and to employ agents and attorneys to liquidate or wind up its affairs.

(b) To continue the conduct of the business insofar as necessary for the disposal or winding up thereof.

(c) To carry out
 contracts and collect, pay, compromise and settle debts and claims for or against the corporation.

(d) To defend suits brought against the corporation.

(e) To sue, in the name of the corporation, for all sums due or owing to the corporation or to recover any of its property.

(f) To collect any amounts remaining unpaid on subscriptions to shares or to recover unlawful distributions.

(g) To sell at public or private sale, exchange, convey or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation for cash in an amount deemed reasonable by the board without compliance with the provisions of Section 1001 (except subdivision (d) thereof), or (subject to compliance with the provisions of Sections 1001, 1200 and 1201, but Chapter 13 (commencing
 with Section 1300) shall not be applicable thereto) upon such other terms and conditions and for such other considerations as the board deems reasonable or expedient; and to execute bills of sale and deeds of conveyance in the name of the corporation.

(h) In general, to make contracts and to do any and all things in the name of the corporation which may be proper or convenient for the purposes of winding up, settling and liquidating the affairs of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

A vacancy on the board may be filled during a winding up proceeding in the manner provided in Section 305.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2003.

When the identity of the directors or their right to hold office is in doubt, or if they are dead or unable to act, or they fail or refuse to act or their whereabouts cannot be ascertained, any interested person may petition the superior court of the proper county to determine the identity of the directors or, if there are no directors, to appoint directors to wind up the affairs of the corporation, after hearing upon such notice to such persons as the court may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2004.

After determining that all the known debts and liabilities of a corporation in the process of winding up have been paid or adequately provided for, the board shall distribute all the remaining corporate assets among the shareholders according to their respective rights and preferences or, if there are no shareholders, to the persons entitled thereto. If the winding up is by court proceeding or subject to court supervision, the distribution shall not be made until after the expiration of any period for the presentation of claims which has been prescribed by order of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2005.

The payment of a debt or liability, whether the whereabouts of the creditor is known or unknown, has been adequately provided for if the payment has been provided for by either of the following means:

(a) Payment thereof has been assumed or guaranteed in good faith by one or more financially responsible corporations or other persons or by the United States government or any agency thereof, and the provision (including the financial responsibility of such corporations or other persons) was determined in good faith and with reasonable care by the board to be adequate at the time of any distribution of the assets by
 the board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The amount of the debt or liability has been deposited as provided in Section 2008.

This section does not prescribe the exclusive means of making adequate provision for debts and liabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.

Distribution may be made either in money or in property or securities and either in installments from time to time or as a whole, if this can be done fairly and ratably and in conformity with the provisions of the articles and the rights of the shareholders, and shall be made as soon as reasonably consistent with the beneficial liquidation of the corporate assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2007.

(a) If the corporation in process of winding up has both preferred and common shares outstanding, a plan of distribution of the shares, obligations or securities of any other corporation, domestic or foreign, or assets other than money which is not in accordance with the liquidation rights of the preferred shares as specified in the articles may nevertheless be adopted if approved by (1) the board and (2) by approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) of each class. The plan may provide that such distribution is in complete or partial satisfaction of the rights of any of such shareholders upon distribution and liquidation of the
 assets.

(b) A plan of distribution so approved shall be binding upon all the shareholders except as provided in subdivision (c). The board shall cause notice of the adoption of the plan to be given by mail within 20 days after its adoption to all holders of shares having a liquidation preference.

(c) Shareholders having a liquidation preference who dissent from the plan of distribution are entitled to be paid the amount of their liquidation preference in cash if they file written demand for payment with the corporation within 30 days after the date of mailing of the notice of the adoption of the plan of distribution, unless the plan of distribution is abandoned. The demand shall state the number and class of the shares held of record by the shareholder in respect of which the shareholder claims payment.

(d) If any
 such demand for cash payment is filed, the board in its discretion may abandon the plan without further approval by the outstanding shares (Section 152), and all shareholders shall then be entitled to distribution according to their rights and liquidation preferences in the process of winding up.

(e) This section shall not apply to a distribution in accordance with a reorganization the principal terms of which have been approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2008.

(a) If any shareholders or creditors are unknown or fail or refuse to accept their payment, dividend, or distribution in cash or property or their whereabouts cannot be ascertained after diligent inquiry, or the existence or amount of a claim of a creditor or shareholder is contingent, contested, or not determined, or if the ownership of any shares of stock is in dispute, the corporation may deposit any such payment, dividend, distribution, or the maximum amount of the claim with the Controller in trust for the benefit of those lawfully
 entitled to the payment, dividend, distribution, or the amount of the claim. The payment, dividend, or distribution shall be paid over by the depositary to the lawful owners, their representatives or assigns, upon satisfactory proof of title.

(b) For the purpose of providing for the transmittal, receipt, accounting for, claiming, management, and investment of all money or other property deposited with the Controller under subdivision (a), the money or other property shall be deemed to be paid or delivered for deposit with the Controller under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and may be recovered in the manner prescribed in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2009.

(a) Whenever in the process of winding up a corporation any distribution of assets has been made, otherwise than under an order of court, without prior payment or adequate provision for payment of any of the debts and liabilities of the corporation, any amount so improperly distributed to any shareholder may be recovered by the corporation. Any of such shareholders may be joined as defendants in the same action or brought in on the motion of any other defendant.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability under subdivision (a) against any or all
 shareholders receiving the distribution by any one or more creditors of the corporation, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment.

(c) Shareholders who satisfy any liability under this section shall have the right of ratable contribution from other distributees similarly liable. Any shareholder who has been compelled to return to the corporation more than the shareholder’s ratable share of the amount needed to pay the debts and liabilities of the corporation may require that the corporation recover from any or all of the other distributees such proportion of the amounts received by them upon the improper distribution as to give contribution to those held liable under this section and make the distribution of the assets fair and ratable, according to the respective rights and preferences of the shares, after payment or adequate provision for payment of all the debts and liabilities of the corporation.

(d) As used in this section, “process of winding up” includes proceedings under Chapters 18 and 19 and also any other distribution of assets to shareholders made in contemplation of termination or abandonment of the corporate business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2010.

(a) A corporation which is dissolved nevertheless continues to exist for the purpose of winding up its affairs, prosecuting and defending actions by or against it and enabling it to collect and discharge obligations, dispose of and convey its property and collect and divide its assets, but not for the purpose of continuing business except so far as necessary for the winding up thereof.

(b) No action or proceeding to which a corporation is a party abates by the dissolution of
 the corporation or by reason of proceedings for winding up and dissolution thereof.

(c) Any assets inadvertently or otherwise omitted from the winding up continue in the dissolved corporation for the benefit of the persons entitled thereto upon dissolution of the corporation and on realization shall be distributed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 12.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2011.

(a) (1) Causes of action against a dissolved corporation, whether arising before or after the dissolution of the corporation, may be enforced against any of the following:

(A) Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets, including, without limitation, any insurance assets held by the corporation that may be available to satisfy claims.

(B) If any of the assets of the dissolved corporation have been distributed to shareholders, against shareholders of the dissolved corporation to the extent of their pro rata share of the claim or to the extent of the corporate assets distributed to them upon dissolution of the
 corporation, whichever is less.

A shareholder’s total liability under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets of the dissolved corporation distributed to the shareholder upon dissolution of the corporation.

(2) Except as set forth in subdivision (c), all causes of action against a shareholder of a dissolved corporation arising under this section are extinguished unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the cause of action against that shareholder of a dissolved corporation prior to the earlier of the following:

(A) The expiration of the statute of limitations applicable to the cause of action.

(B) Four years after the effective date of the dissolution of the corporation.

(3) As a
 matter of procedure only, and not for purposes of determining liability, shareholders of the dissolved corporation may be sued in the corporate name of the corporation upon any cause of action against the corporation. This section does not affect the rights of the corporation or its creditors under Section 2009, or the rights, if any, of creditors under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act, which may arise against the shareholders of a corporation.

(4) This subdivision applies to corporations dissolved on and after January 1, 1992. Corporations dissolved prior to that date are subject to the law in effect prior to that date.

(b) Summons or other process against such a corporation may be served by delivering a copy thereof to an officer, director, or person having charge of its assets or, if no such person can be found, to any agent upon whom process might be served at the time of
 dissolution. If none of those persons can be found with due diligence and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court, then the court may make an order that summons or other process be served upon the dissolved corporation by personally delivering a copy thereof, together with a copy of the order, to the Secretary of State or an assistant or deputy secretary of state. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(c) Every such corporation shall survive and continue to exist indefinitely for the purpose of being sued in any quiet title action. Any judgment rendered in any such action shall bind each and all of its shareholders or other persons having any equity or other interest in that corporation, to the extent of their interest therein, and that action shall have the same force and effect as an action brought under the provisions of Sections 410.50 and
 410.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Service of summons or other process in any such action may be made as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) Upon receipt of that process and the fee therefor, the Secretary of State forthwith shall give notice to the corporation as provided in Section 1702.

(e) For purposes of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19071) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the liability described in this section shall be considered a liability at law with respect to a dissolved corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 26.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 21. Foreign Corporations [2100. - 2117.1.]

2100.

This chapter applies only to foreign corporations transacting intrastate business, except as otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

(a) Any foreign corporation (other than a foreign association) not transacting intrastate business may register its corporate name with the Secretary of State, provided its corporate name would be available pursuant to Section 201 to a new corporation organized under this division at the time of such registration.
